dictsource/rom_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Romani

.L01 b c č čh d dž f g h j k kh l m n p ph r s š t th v x z ž   // Consonants

.group a
        a          a
    a      (_  'a
	a      (L01_ 'a
	 
.group b
        b          b
		
.group c
        c          ts
		
.group č
        č          tS
	čh         tS#
	
.group d
        d          d
	dž         dZ
	
.group e
        e          e
    e      (_  'e
	e      (L01_ 'e
	 
.group f
        f          f
		
.group g
        g          g
		
.group h
        h          h
		
.group i
        i          i
    i      (_  'i
	i      (L01_ 'i
	 
.group j
        j          j
		
.group k
        k          k
    kh        k#

.group l
        l          l
		
.group m
        m          m
		
.group n
        n          n
		
.group o
        o          o
    o      (_  'o
	o      (L01_ 'o
	 
.group p
        p          p
	ph         ph
	
.group r
        r          r
	rr         r
		
.group s
        s          s
		
.group š
        š          S
		
.group t
        t          t
    th         t#
	
.group u
        u          u
    u      (_  'u
	u      (L01_ 'u
	 
.group v
        v          v
		
.group x
        x          x
		
.group z
        z          z
		
.group ž
        ž          Z
		

.group
    ć       tS
	ćh      tS#
	dź      dZ
	ë       @
	q       k
	ś       S
	θ       t
	w       w
	ź       Z
	ʒ       dz
	
